North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 8. Securities Regulation.
Storm Recovery Bonds Not Public Debt. — Neither the State nor its political subdivisions are liable on any storm recovery bonds, and the bonds are not a debt or a general obligation of the State or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities, nor are they special obligations or indebtedness of the State or any agency or political subdivision. An issue of storm recovery bonds does not, directly, indirectly, or contingently, obligate the State or any agency, political subdivision, or instrumentality of the State to levy any tax or make any appropriation for payment of the storm recovery bonds, other than in their capacity as consumers of electricity. All storm recovery bonds must contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect: “Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of North Carolina is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on, this bond.”

Legal Investment. — All of the following entities may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds in storm recovery bonds:

Subject to applicable statutory restrictions on State or local investment authority, the State, units of local government, political subdivisions, public bodies, and public officers, except for members of the Commission.

Banks and bankers, savings and loan associations, credit unions, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, investment companies, insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on a banking or insurance business.

Personal representatives, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries.

All other persons authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar nature.

Obligation of Nonimpairment. —

The State and its agencies, including the Commission, pledge and agree with bondholders, the owners of the storm recovery property, and other financing parties that the State and its agencies will not take any action listed in this subdivision. This paragraph does not preclude limitation or alteration if full compensation is made by law for the full protection of the storm recovery charges collected pursuant to a financing order and of the bondholders and any assignee or financing party entering into a contract with the public utility. The prohibited actions are as follows:

Alter the provisions of this section, which authorize the Commission to create an irrevocable contract right or chose in action by the issuance of a financing order, to create storm recovery property, and make the storm recovery charges imposed by a financing order irrevocable, binding, or nonbypassable charges.

Take or permit any action that impairs or would impair the value of storm recovery property or the security for the storm recovery bonds or revises the storm recovery costs for which recovery is authorized.

In any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders, assignees, and other financing parties.

Except for changes made pursuant to the formula-based adjustment mechanism authorized under this section, reduce, alter, or impair storm recovery charges that are to be imposed, billed, charged, collected, and remitted for the benefit of the bondholders, any assignee, and any other financing parties until any and all principal, interest, premium, financing costs and other fees, expenses, or charges incurred, and any contracts to be performed, in connection with the related storm recovery bonds have been paid and performed in full.

Any person or entity that issues storm recovery bonds may include the language specified in this subsection in the storm recovery bonds and related documentation.

Not a Public Utility. — An assignee or financing party is not a public utility or person providing electric service by virtue of engaging in the transactions described in this section.

Conflicts. — If there is a conflict between this section and any other law regarding the attachment, assignment, or perfection, or the effect of perfection, or priority of, assignment or transfer of, or security interest in storm recovery property, this section shall govern.

Consultation. — In making determinations under this section, the Commission or Public Staff or both may engage an outside consultant and counsel.

Effect of Invalidity. — If any provision of this section is held invalid or is invalidated, superseded, replaced, repealed, or expires for any reason, that occurrence does not affect the validity of any action allowed under this section which is taken by a public utility, an assignee, a financing party, a collection agent, or a party to an ancillary agreement; and any such action remains in full force and effect with respect to all storm recovery bonds issued or authorized in a financing order issued under this section before the date that such provision is held invalid or is invalidated, superseded, replaced, or repealed, or expires for any reason.

History.

2019-244, s. 1; 2021-23, ss. 24, 25.